Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
582

INTERSTATE
COMPACT ON JUVENILES

Section

582-1 Execution of compact

582-1.5 Amendment to compact concerning interstate
rendition

of juveniles alleged to be delinquent

582-2 Juvenile compact administrator

582-3 Supplementary agreements

582-4 Financial arrangements

582-5 Fees

582-6 Reimbursement of public funds expended

582-7 Responsibilities of state departments,
agencies, and

officers

582-8 Delinquent child included

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next